Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 613. REEMPLOYMENT FOLLOWING MILITARY SERVICE

SUBCHAPTER A. REEMPLOYMENT

Sec. 613.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Local governmental entity" means a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state.

(2) "Military service" means service as a member of:

(A) the Armed Forces of the United States;

(B) the Texas National Guard;

(C) the Texas State Guard; or

(D) a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(3) "Public employee" means an employee of the state, a state institution, or a local governmental entity. The term does not include a temporary employee, an elected official, or an individual serving under an appointment that requires confirmation by the senate.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 613.002. REEMPLOYMENT TO SAME POSITION FOLLOWING MILITARY SERVICE. (a) A public employee who leaves a state position or a position with a local governmental entity to enter active military service is entitled to be reemployed:

(1) by the state or the local governmental entity;

(2) in the same department, office, commission, or board of this state, a state institution, or local governmental entity in which the employee was employed at the time of the employee's induction or enlistment in, or order to, active military service; and

(3) in:

(A) the same position held at the time of the induction, enlistment, or order; or

(B) a position of similar seniority, status, and pay.

(b) To be entitled to reemployment under Subsection (a), the employee must be:

(1) discharged, separated, or released from active military service under honorable conditions not later than the fifth anniversary of the date of induction, enlistment, or call to active military service; and

(2) physically and mentally qualified to perform the duties of that position.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 613.003. REEMPLOYMENT TO ANOTHER POSITION FOLLOWING MILITARY SERVICE. A public employee who cannot perform the duties of a position to which the employee is otherwise entitled under Section 613.002 because of a disability the employee sustained during military service is entitled to be reemployed in the department, office, commission, or board of the state, a state institution, or a local governmental entity in a position that the employee can perform and that has:

(1) like seniority, status, and pay as the former position; or

(2) the nearest possible seniority, status, and pay to the former position.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 613.004. APPLICATION FOR REEMPLOYMENT. (a) A veteran eligible for reemployment under this chapter must apply for reemployment not later than the 90th day after the date the veteran is discharged or released from active military service.

(b) An application for reemployment must:

(1) be made to the head of the department, office, commission, or board of this state, the state institution, or the local governmental entity that employed the veteran before the veteran entered military service;

(2) be in writing; and

(3) have attached to it evidence of the veteran's discharge, separation, or release from military service under honorable conditions.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 613.005. DISCHARGE FOLLOWING REEMPLOYMENT. An individual reemployed under this chapter may not be discharged from the position without cause before the first anniversary of the date of reemployment.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 613.006. ENTITLEMENT TO RETIREMENT OR OTHER BENEFITS. An individual reemployed under this chapter is considered to have been on furlough or leave of absence during the time the individual was in military service and may participate in retirement or other benefits to which a public employee is or may be entitled.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER B. ENFORCEMENT

Sec. 613.021. COMPLIANCE WITH LAW; HEARING. (a) If a public official fails to comply with a provision of Subchapter A, a district court in the district in which the individual is a public official may require the public official to comply with the provision on the filing of a motion, petition, or other appropriate pleading by an individual entitled to a benefit under the provision.

(b) The court shall order a speedy hearing and shall advance the hearing on the calendar.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 613.022. DISTRICT ATTORNEY. On application to the district attorney of the appropriate district by an individual who the district attorney reasonably believes is entitled to the benefit of a provision of Subchapter A, the district attorney shall:

(1) appear and act as attorney for the individual in an amicable adjustment of the claim; or

(2) file or prosecute a motion, petition, or other appropriate pleading to specifically require compliance with the provision.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 613.023. COURT COSTS AND FEES. A person applying for benefits under Subchapter A may not be charged court costs or fees for a claim, motion, petition, or other pleading filed under Section 613.021.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.